fr: Conception de couronne: Floral; Vigne; Cerceau; Métal; Styromousse; Fil de fer; Bois; Autre
sk-SK: Dizajn venca: Kvetinový; Vinič hroznorodý; Obručový; Kovový; Polystyrénový; Drôtený; Drevný; Iné
en: Wreath design: Floral; Grapevine; Hoop; Metal; Styrofoam; Wire; Wood; Other
sv: Kransdesign: Blommig; Vinranka; Ring; Metall; Styrofoam; Tråd; Trä; Övrigt
bg-BG: Дизайн на венец: Флорален; Лоза; Обръч; Метал; Стиропор; Тел; Дърво; Други
ro-RO: Design coroană: Floral; Viță de vie; Inel; Metal; Polistiren; Sârmă; Lemn; Altele
cs: Design věnce: Květinový; Víno; Obruč; Kov; Pěnový polystyren; Drát; Dřevo; Jiné
lt-LT: Vainiko dizainas: Gėlės; Vynuogės; Lankas; Metalas; Putų polistirolas; Viela; Mediena; Kita
el: Σχέδιο στεφανιού: Φλοράλ; αμπέλι; Στεφάνι; Μέταλλο; Φελιζόλ; Δέσιμο με σύρμα; Ξύλο; Άλλο
da: Kransdesign: Blomster; Grapevine; Ring; Metal; Flamingo; Tråd; Træ; Andet
pt-BR: Formato da guirlanda: Floral; Videira; Argola; Metal; Isopor; Fio; Madeira; Outro
ja: リースの種類: フローラル; グレープバイン; フープ; 金属; 発泡スチロール; ワイヤー; 木材; その他
es: Diseño de corona: Floral; Parra; Aro; Metal; Espuma de poliestireno; Alambre; Madera; Otros
de: Kranzdesign: Blumenmuster; Weinrebe; Reifen; Metall; Styropor; Draht; Holz; Sonstiges
vi: Thiết kế vòng hoa: Hoa cỏ; Cây nho; Vòng; Kim loại; Xốp; Dây điện; Gỗ; Khác
fi: Seppeleen muotoilu: Kukikas; Rypäle; Vanne; Metalli; Vaahtomuovi; Lanka; Puu; Muu
nb: Kransdesign: Blomster; Vinranke; Bøyle; Metall; Styrofoam; Metalltråd; Trevirke; Annet
nl: Kransontwerp: Gebloemd; Wijnstok; Hoepel; Metaal; Piepschuim; Draad; Hout; Andere
th: การออกแบบพวงหรีด: ลายดอก; เถาองุ่น; ห่วง; โลหะ; สไตโรโฟม; ลวด; ไม้; อื่นๆ
pl: Projekt wieńca: Kwiatowy; Winorośl; Obręcz; Metal; Styropian; Walcówka; Drewno; Inne
pt-PT: Desenho de guirlanda: Floral; Videira; Aro; Metal; Esferovite; Arame; Madeira; Outro
ru: Конструкция венка: Цветы; Виноградная лоза; Обруч; Металл; Пенополистирол; Проволока; Дерево; Другое
hr-HR: Dizajn vijenca: Cvjetni; Vinova loza; Obruč; Metalni; Stiropor; Žičani; Drvo; Ostalo
sl-SI: Zasnova venca: Cvetličen; Vinska trta; Obroč; Kovinski; Stiropor; Žica; Lesen; Drugo
tr: Çelenk tasarımı: Çiçek; Asma; Çember; Metal; Strafor; Tel; Ahşap; Diğer
zh-CN: 花环设计: 花型; 葡萄藤; 圈环; 金属; 泡沫塑料; 金属丝; 木头; 其他
it: Design della ghirlanda: Floreale; Vite; Cerchio; Metallo; Polistirolo; Filo; Legno; Altro
hu: Koszorú kialakítása: Virágos; Szőlőtő; Gyűrű; Fém; Hungarocell; Huzal; Fa; Egyéb
zh-TW: 花環設計: 花卉; 葡萄藤; 環形; 金屬; 保麗龍; 線圈; 木材; 其他
ko: 리스 디자인: 꽃; 포도덩굴; 후프; 금속; 스티로폼; 와이어; 목재; 기타